Mississippi statutes. Title 59. Ports, Harbors, Landings and Watercraft
Foreign Trade Zones

§ 59-3-31.
“Public corporation” defined.

The term “public corporation”, for the purposes of Sections 59-3-31 through 59-3-37, means the State of Mississippi or any political subdivision thereof or any public agency of this state or of any political subdivision thereof or any public board, bureau, commission or authority created by the legislature of the State of Mississippi.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7564-42; Laws, 1966, ch. 288, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved June 14, 1966).

§ 59-3-33.
Establishment and operation by public corporation.

Any public corporation of the State of Mississippi, as that term is defined in Section 59-3-31, is hereby authorized to make application for the privilege of establishing, operating and maintaining a foreign-trade zone in accordance with an Act of Congress approved June 18, 1934, entitled “An Act to provide for the establishment, operation, and maintenance of foreign-trade zones in ports of entry of the United States, to expedite and encourage foreign commerce, and for other purposes.”

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7564-41; Laws, 1966, ch. 288, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved June 14, 1966).

§ 59-3-35.
Establishment and operation by private corporation.

Any private corporation hereafter organized under the laws of this state for the purpose of establishing, operating and maintaining a foreign-trade zone in accordance with the Act of Congress referred to in Section 59-3-33, is likewise hereby authorized to make application for the privilege of establishing, operating and maintaining a foreign-trade zone in accordance with the said Act of Congress.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7564-43; Laws, 1966, ch. 288, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved June 14, 1966).

§ 59-3-37.
Operation and maintenance pursuant to terms of Act of Congress.

Any public or private corporation authorized by Sections 59-3-31 through 59-3-37 to make application for the privilege of establishing, operating and maintaining such foreign-trade zone, whose application is granted pursuant to the terms of the Act of Congress referred to in Section 59-3-33, is hereby authorized to establish such foreign-trade zone and to operate and maintain the same, subject to the conditions and restrictions of said Act of Congress, and any amendments thereto, and under such rules and regulations and for the period of time that may be prescribed by the board established by said Act of Congress to carry out the provisions of said Act of Congress.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 7564-44; Laws, 1966, ch. 288, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved June 14, 1966).